Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2440
Interested shareholder, defined.

Interested shareholder shall mean any person, other than the issuing public corporation or any subsidiary of the issuing public corporation, who is (1) the owner, directly or indirectly, of ten percent or more of the outstanding voting stock of such corporation or (2) an affiliate or associate of such corporation and at any time within the five-year period immediately prior to the date in question was the owner, directly or indirectly, of ten percent or more of the then outstanding voting stock of such corporation. For the purpose of determining whether a person is an interested shareholder, the number of shares of voting stock of such corporation deemed to be outstanding shall include shares deemed to be owned by such person but shall not include any other unissued shares of voting stock of such corporation which may be issuable pursuant to any agreement, arrangement, or understanding or upon exercise of conversion rights, warrants, or options or otherwise.

Laws 1988, LB 1110, § 10.